Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,236
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,236 to 81-15,253 shall be known and may be cited as the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Contractors Certification and System Registration Act.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB333, § 1.